California statutes. Penal Code
(4) The court shall apply the three-month minimum sentence specified in this subdivision, except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by granting probation or suspending the execution or imposition of sentence without the minimum imprisonment required in this subdivision or by granting probation or suspending the execution or imposition of sentence with conditions other than those set forth in this subdivision, in which case the court shall specify on the record
 and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by this disposition.

(h) Notwithstanding Section 25605, any person who brings or possesses a loaded firearm upon the grounds of a campus of, or buildings owned or operated for student housing, teaching, research, or administration by, a public or private university or college, that are contiguous or are clearly marked university property, unless it is with the written permission of the university or college president, their designee, or equivalent university or college authority, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years. Notwithstanding subdivision (k), a university or college shall post a prominent notice at primary entrances on noncontiguous property stating
 that firearms are prohibited on that property pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 25605, any person who brings or possesses a firearm upon the grounds of a campus of, or buildings owned or operated for student housing, teaching, research, or administration by, a public or private university or college, that are contiguous or are clearly marked university property, unless it is with the written permission of the university or college president, their designee, or equivalent university or college authority, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for one, two, or three years. Notwithstanding subdivision (k), a university or college shall post a prominent notice at primary entrances on noncontiguous property stating that firearms are prohibited on that property pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(j) For purposes of this section, a firearm shall be deemed to be loaded when there is an unexpended cartridge or shell, consisting of a case that holds a charge of powder and a bullet or shot, in, or attached in any manner to, the firearm, including, but not limited to, in the firing chamber, magazine, or clip thereof attached to the firearm. A muzzle-loader firearm shall be deemed to be loaded when it is capped or primed and has a powder charge and ball or shot in the barrel or cylinder.

(k) This section does not require that notice be posted regarding the proscribed conduct.

(l) This section does not apply to a duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of
 Title 3 of Part 2, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in California, any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while they are actually engaged in assisting the officer, a member of the military forces of this state or of the United States who is engaged in the performance of their duties, or an armored vehicle guard, engaged in the performance of their duties as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 7582.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(m) This section does not apply to a security guard authorized to carry a loaded firearm pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 26000) of Chapter 3 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(n) This section does not apply to an existing shooting range at a public or private school or university or college campus.

(o) This section does not apply to an honorably retired peace officer authorized to carry a concealed or loaded firearm pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(2) Section 25650.

(3) Sections 25900 to 25910, inclusive.

(4) Section 26020.

(5) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 26300.

(p) This section does not apply to a peace officer appointed pursuant to Section 830.6 who is authorized to carry a firearm by the appointing agency.

(q) (1) This section does not apply to the activities of a program involving shooting sports or activities, including, but not limited to, trap shooting, skeet shooting, sporting clays, and pistol shooting, that are sanctioned by a school, school district, college, university, or other governing body of the institution, that occur on the grounds of a public or private school or university or college campus.

(2) This section does not apply to the activities of a state-certified hunter education program pursuant to Section 3051 of the Fish and Game Code if
 all firearms are unloaded and participants do not possess live ammunition in a school building.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 6.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

626.91.

Possession of ammunition on school grounds is governed by Section 30310.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 1.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

626.92.

Section 626.9 does not apply to or affect any of the following:

(a) A security guard authorized to openly carry an unloaded handgun pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(b) An honorably retired peace officer authorized to openly carry an unloaded handgun pursuant to Section 26361.

(c) A security guard authorized to openly carry an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26400) of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(d) An honorably retired peace officer authorized to openly carry an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun pursuant to Section 26405.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

626.95.

(a) Any person who is in violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), or subdivision (b), of Section 417, or Section 25400 or 25850, upon the grounds of or within a playground, or a public or private youth center during hours in which the facility is open for business, classes, or school-related programs, or at any time when minors are using the facility, knowing that he or she is on or within those grounds, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for one, two, or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(b) State and local authorities are encouraged to cause signs to be posted around playgrounds and youth centers giving warning of prohibition of the possession of firearms upon the grounds of or within
 playgrounds or youth centers.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Playground” means any park or recreational area specifically designed to be used by children that has play equipment installed, including public grounds designed for athletic activities such as baseball, football, soccer, or basketball, or any similar facility located on public or private school grounds, or on city or county parks.

(2) “Youth center” means any public or private facility that is used to host recreational or social activities for minors while minors are present.

(d) It is the Legislature’s intent that only an actual conviction of a felony of one of the offenses specified in this section would subject the person to firearms
 disabilities under the federal Gun Control Act of 1968 (P.L. 90-618; 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 147.3.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

626.10.

(a) (1) Any person, except a duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in this state, a person summoned by any officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while the person is actually engaged in assisting any officer, or a member of the military forces of this state or the United States who is engaged in the performance of his or her duties, who brings or possesses any dirk, dagger, ice pick, knife having a blade longer than 212 inches, folding knife with a blade that locks into place, razor with an unguarded
 blade, taser, or stun gun, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 244.5, any instrument that expels a metallic projectile, such as a BB or a pellet, through the force of air pressure, CO2 pressure, or spring action, or any spot marker gun, upon the grounds of, or within, any public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) Any person, except a duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in this state, a person summoned by any officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while the person is actually engaged in assisting any
 officer, or a member of the military forces of this state or the United States who is engaged in the performance of his or her duties, who brings or possesses a razor blade or a box cutter upon the grounds of, or within, any public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(b) Any person, except a duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, a full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying out official duties while in this state, a person summoned by any officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace while the person is actually engaged in assisting any officer, or a member of the military forces of this state or the United States who is engaged in the performance of his or her
 duties, who brings or possesses any dirk, dagger, ice pick, or knife having a fixed blade longer than 212 inches upon the grounds of, or within, any private university, the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any person who brings or possesses a knife having a blade longer than 212 inches, a razor with an unguarded blade, a razor blade, or a box cutter upon the grounds of, or within, a public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive,
 or any private university, state university, or community college at the direction of a faculty member of the private university, state university, or community college, or a certificated or classified employee of the school for use in a private university, state university, community college, or school-sponsored activity or class.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any person who brings or possesses an ice pick, a knife having a blade longer than 212 inches, a razor with an unguarded blade, a razor blade, or a box cutter upon the grounds of, or within, a public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or any private university, state university, or community college for a lawful purpose within the scope of the person’s employment.

(e) Subdivision (b) does not apply to any person who brings or possesses an ice pick or a knife having a fixed blade longer than 212 inches upon the grounds of, or within, any private university, state university, or community college for lawful use in or around a residence or residential facility located upon those grounds or for lawful use in food preparation or consumption.

(f) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any person who brings an instrument that expels a metallic projectile, such as a BB or a pellet, through the force of air pressure, CO2 pressure, or spring action, or any spot marker gun, or any razor blade or box cutter upon the grounds of, or within, a public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, if the person has the written permission of the school
 principal or his or her designee.

(g) Any certificated or classified employee or school peace officer of a public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, may seize any of the weapons described in subdivision (a), and any certificated or classified employee or school peace officer of any private university, state university, or community college may seize any of the weapons described in subdivision (b), from the possession of any person upon the grounds of, or within, the school if he or she knows, or has reasonable cause to know, the person is prohibited from bringing or possessing the weapon upon the grounds of, or within, the school.

(h) As used in this section, “dirk” or “dagger” means a knife or other instrument with or without a handguard that is capable of ready use as a stabbing weapon that may inflict great bodily injury
 or death.

(i) Any person who, without the written permission of the college or university president or chancellor or his or her designee, brings or possesses a less lethal weapon, as defined in Section 16780, or a stun gun, as defined in Section 17230, upon the grounds of, or within, a public or private college or university campus is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 147.5.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

626.11.

(a) Any evidence seized by a teacher, official, employee, or governing board member of any university, state university, or community college, or by any person acting under his or her direction or with his or her consent in violation of standards relating to rights under the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution or under Section 13 of Article I of the State Constitution to be free from unreasonable searches and seizures, or in violation of state or federal constitutional rights to privacy, or any of them, is inadmissible in administrative disciplinary proceedings.

(b) Any provision in an agreement between a student and an educational institution specified in subdivision (a) relating to the leasing, renting, or use of a room of any student dormitory owned or operated by the institution by which the student waives a constitutional right under the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution or under Section 13 of Article I of the State Constitution, or under state or federal constitutional provision guaranteeing a right to privacy, or any of them, is contrary to public policy and void.

(c) Any evidence seized by a person specified in subdivision (a) after a nonconsensual entry not in violation of subdivision (a) into a dormitory room, which evidence is not directly related to the purpose for which the entry was initially made, is not admissible in administrative disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 208.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.1. Access to School Premises [627. - 627.10.]

627.

(a) The Legislature finds the following:

(1) Violent crimes perpetrated on public school grounds interfere with the education of students and threaten the health and safety of teachers, other employees, and students.

(2) Many serious crimes of violence are committed on school grounds by persons who are neither students nor school employees and who are not otherwise authorized to be present on school grounds.

(3) School officials and law enforcement officers, in seeking to control these persons, have been hindered by the lack of effective legislation restricting the access of unauthorized persons to school grounds and providing appropriate criminal sanctions for unauthorized entry.

(b) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to safeguard the teachers, other employees, students, and property of public schools. The Legislature recognizes the right to visit school grounds for legitimate nonviolent purposes and does not intend by this enactment to interfere with the exercise of that right.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that a disproportionate share of crimes committed on school campuses are committed by persons who are neither students, school officials, or staff, and who have no lawful business on the school grounds.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to promote the safety and security of the public schools by restricting and conditioning the access of unauthorized persons to school campuses and to thereby implement the provisions of Section 28 of Article 1 of the California Constitution which guarantee all students and staff the inalienable constitutional right to attend safe, secure, and peaceful public schools. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to infringe upon the legitimate exercise of constitutionally protected rights of freedom of speech and expression which may be expressed through rallies, demonstrations, and other forms of expression which may be appropriately engaged in by students and nonstudents in a campus setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

627.1.

As used in this chapter, with regard to a public school:

(a) An “outsider” is any person other than:

(1) A student of the school; except that a student who is currently suspended from the school shall be deemed an outsider for purposes of this chapter.

(2) A parent or guardian of a student of the school.

(3) An officer or employee of the school district that maintains the school. 

(4) A public employee whose employment requires him or her to be on school grounds, or any person who is on school grounds at the request of the school.

(5) A representative of a school employee organization who is engaged in activities related to the representation of school employees.

(6) An elected public official.

(7) A person who comes within the provisions of Section 1070 of the Evidence Code by virtue of his or her current employment or occupation.

(b) “School grounds” are the buildings and grounds of the public school.

(c) “School hours” extend from one hour before classes begin until one hour after classes end.

(d) “Principal” is the chief administrative officer of the public school.

(e) “Designee” is a person whom the principal has authorized to register outsiders pursuant to this chapter.

(f) “Superintendent” is the superintendent of the school district that maintains the school or a person (other than the principal or someone employed under the principal’s supervision) who the superintendent has authorized to conduct hearings pursuant to Section 627.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

627.2.

No outsider shall enter or remain on school grounds during school hours without having registered with the principal or designee, except to proceed expeditiously to the office of the principal or designee for the purpose of registering. If signs posted in accordance with Section 627.6 restrict the entrance or route that outsiders may use to reach the office of the principal or designee, an outsider shall comply with such signs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

627.3.

In order to register, an outsider shall upon request furnish the principal or designee with the following:

(1) His or her name, address, and occupation.

(2) His or her age, if less than 21.

(3) His or her purpose in entering school grounds.

(4) Proof of identity.

(5) Other information consistent with the purposes of this chapter and with other provisions of law.

No person who furnishes the information and the proof of identity required by this section shall be refused registration except as provided by Section 627.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

627.4.

(a) The principal or his or her designee may refuse to register an outsider if he or she has a reasonable basis for concluding that the outsider’s presence or acts would disrupt the school, its students, its teachers, or its other employees; would result in damage to property; or would result in the distribution or use of unlawful or controlled substances.

(b) The principal, his or her designee, or school security officer may revoke an outsider’s registration if he or she has a reasonable basis for concluding that the outsider’s presence on school grounds would interfere or is interfering with the peaceful conduct of the activities of the school, or would disrupt or is disrupting the school, its students, its teachers, or its other employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 395, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

627.5.

Any person who is denied registration or whose registration is revoked may request a hearing before the principal or superintendent on the propriety of the denial or revocation. The request shall be in writing, shall state why the denial or revocation was improper, shall give the address to which notice of hearing is to be sent, and shall be delivered to either the principal or the superintendent within five days after the denial or revocation. The principal or superintendent shall promptly mail a written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to the person who requested the hearing. A hearing before the principal shall be held within seven days after the principal receives the request. A hearing before the superintendent shall be held within seven days after the superintendent receives the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

627.6.

At each entrance to the school grounds of every public school at which this chapter is in force, signs shall be posted specifying the hours during which registration is required pursuant to Section 627.2, stating where the office of the principal or designee is located and what route to take to that office, and setting forth the applicable requirements of Section 627.2 and the penalties for violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

627.7.

(a) It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or by both, for an outsider to fail or refuse to leave the school grounds promptly after the principal, designee, or school security officer has requested the outsider to leave or to fail to remain off the school grounds for 7 days after being requested to leave, if the outsider does any of the following:

(1) Enters or remains on school grounds without having registered as required by Section 627.2.

(2) Enters or remains on school grounds after having been denied registration pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 627.4.

(3) Enters or remains on school grounds after having registration revoked pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 627.4.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not be utilized to impinge upon the lawful exercise of constitutionally protected rights of freedom of speech or assembly.

(c) When a person is directed to leave pursuant to subdivision (a), the person directing him or her to leave shall inform the person that if he or she reenters the place within 7 days he or she will be guilty of a crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1054, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

627.8.

Every outsider who willfully and knowingly violates this chapter after having been previously convicted of a violation of this chapter committed within seven years of the date of two or more prior violations that resulted in conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both such imprisonment and a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 395, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

627.8a.

The penalties imposed by the provisions of this chapter shall be utilized to prevent, deter, and punish those committing crimes on school campuses. The penalties imposed by the provisions of this chapter shall not be utilized to infringe upon the legitimate exercise of constitutionally protected rights of free speech or assembly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 395, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

627.9.

The governing board of any school district may:

(a) Exempt the district or any school or class of schools in the district from the operation of this chapter.

(b) Make exceptions to Section 627.2 for particular classes of outsiders.

(c) Authorize principals to exempt individual outsiders from the operation of Section 627.2; but any such exemption shall be in a writing which is signed and dated by the principal and which specifies the person or persons exempted and the date on which the exemption will expire.

(d) Exempt, or authorize principals to exempt, designated portions of school grounds from the operation of this chapter during some or all school hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

627.10.

A person whose presence or conduct on school grounds violates another provision of law may be punished for that violation, regardless of whether he or she was registered pursuant to this chapter at the time of the violation; but no punishment shall be imposed contrary to Section 654.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.3. Massage Therapy [628. - 628.5.]

628.

A person who provides a certificate, transcript, diploma, or other document, or otherwise affirms that a person has received instruction in massage therapy knowing that the person has not received instruction in massage therapy or knowing that the person has not received massage therapy instruction consistent with that document or affirmation is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

628.5.

For any person that is criminally prosecuted for a violation of law in connection with massage therapy, including for crimes relating to prostitution, the arresting law enforcement agency may provide to the California Massage Therapy Council, created pursuant to Section 4600.5 of the Business and Professions Code, information concerning the massage therapy instruction received by the person prosecuted, including the name of the school attended, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.4. Interception of Wire, Electronic Digital Pager, or Electronic Cellular Telephone Communications [629.50. - 629.98.]

629.50.

(a) Each application for an order authorizing the interception of a wire or electronic communication shall be made in writing upon the personal oath or affirmation of the Attorney General, Chief Deputy Attorney General, or Chief Assistant Attorney General, Criminal Law Division, or of a district attorney, or the person designated to act as district attorney in the district attorney’s
 absence, to the presiding judge of the superior court or one other judge designated by the presiding judge. An ordered list of additional judges may be authorized by the presiding judge to sign an order authorizing an interception. One of these judges may hear an application and sign an order only if that judge makes a determination that the presiding judge, the first designated judge, and those judges higher on the list are unavailable. Each application shall include all of the following information:

(1) The identity of the investigative or law enforcement officer making the application, and the officer authorizing the application.

(2) The identity of the law enforcement agency that is to execute the order.

(3) A statement attesting to a review of the application and the circumstances in support thereof by the chief
 executive officer, or his or her designee, of the law enforcement agency making the application. This statement shall name the chief executive officer or the designee who effected this review.

(4) A full and complete statement of the facts and circumstances relied upon by the applicant to justify his or her belief that an order should be issued, including (A) details as to the particular offense that has been, is being, or is about to be committed, (B) the fact that conventional investigative techniques had been tried and were unsuccessful, or why they reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed or to be too dangerous, (C) a particular description of the nature and location of the facilities from which or the place where the communication is to be intercepted, (D) a particular description of the type of communication sought to be intercepted, and (E) the identity, if known, of the person committing the offense and whose communications are to be
 intercepted, or if that person’s identity is not known, then the information relating to the person’s identity that is known to the applicant.

(5) A statement of the period of time for which the interception is required to be maintained, and if the nature of the investigation is such that the authorization for interception should not automatically terminate when the described type of communication has been first obtained, a particular description of the facts establishing probable cause to believe that additional communications of the same type will occur thereafter.

(6) A full and complete statement of the facts concerning all previous applications known, to the individual authorizing and to the individual making the application, to have been made to any judge of a state or federal court for authorization to intercept wire or electronic communications involving any of the same
 persons, facilities, or places specified in the application, and the action taken by the judge on each of those applications. This requirement may be satisfied by making inquiry of the California Attorney General and the United States Department of Justice and reporting the results of these inquiries in the application.

(7) If the application is for the extension of an order, a statement setting forth the number of communications intercepted pursuant to the original order, and the results thus far obtained from the interception, or a reasonable explanation of the failure to obtain results.

(8) An application for modification of an order may be made when there is probable cause to believe that the person or persons identified in the original order have commenced to use a facility or device that is not subject to the original order. Any modification under this subdivision shall only
 be valid for the period authorized under the order being modified. The application for modification shall meet all of the requirements in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, and shall include a statement of the results thus far obtained from the interception, or a reasonable explanation for the failure to obtain results.

(b) The judge may require the applicant to furnish additional testimony or documentary evidence in support of an application for an order under this section.

(c) The judge shall accept a facsimile copy of the signature of any person required to give a personal oath or affirmation pursuant to subdivision (a) as an original signature to the application. The original signed document shall be sealed and kept with the application pursuant to the provisions of Section 629.66 and custody of the original signed document shall be in the same manner as the judge orders for
 the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.51.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Wire communication” means any aural transfer made in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by the aid of wire, cable, or other like connection between the point of origin and the point of reception (including the use of a like connection in a switching station), furnished or operated by any person engaged in providing or operating these facilities for the transmission of communications.

(2) “Electronic communication” means any transfer of signs, signals, writings, images, sounds, data,
 or intelligence of any nature in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectric, or photo-optical system, but does not include any of the following:

(A) Any wire communication defined in paragraph (1).

(B) Any communication made through a tone-only paging device.

(C) Any communication from a tracking device.

(D) Electronic funds transfer information stored by a financial institution in a communications system used for the electronic storage and transfer of funds.

(3) “Tracking device” means an electronic or mechanical device that permits the tracking of the movement of a person or
 object.

(4) “Aural transfer” means a transfer containing the human voice at any point between and including the point of origin and the point of reception.

(5) (A) “Prohibited violation” means any violation of law that creates liability for, or arising out of, either of the following:

(i) Providing, facilitating, or obtaining a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, that is lawful under California law.

(ii) Intending or attempting to provide, facilitate, or obtain a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, that is lawful under California law.

(B) As used in this paragraph, “facilitating” or “facilitate” means assisting, directly or indirectly in any way, with the obtaining of a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, that is lawful under California law.

(b) This chapter applies to the interceptions of wire and electronic communications. It does not apply to stored communications or stored content.

(c) The act that added this subdivision is not intended to change the law as to stored communications or stored content.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 679, Sec. 9.   (AB 82)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.52.

Upon application made under Section 629.50, the judge may enter an ex parte order, as requested or modified, authorizing interception of wire or electronic communications initially intercepted within the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the judge is sitting, if the judge determines, on the basis of the facts submitted by the applicant, all of the following:

(a) There is probable cause to believe that an individual is committing, has committed, or is about to commit, one of the following offenses:

(1) Importation, possession for sale, transportation, manufacture, or sale of controlled substances in violation of Section 11351, 11351.5,
 11352, 11370.6, 11378, 11378.5, 11379, 11379.5, or 11379.6 of the Health and Safety Code with respect to a substance containing heroin, cocaine, PCP, methamphetamine, fentanyl, or their precursors or analogs where the substance exceeds 10 gallons by liquid volume or three pounds of solid substance by weight.

(2) Murder, solicitation to commit murder, a violation of Section 209, or the commission of a felony involving a destructive device in violation of Section 18710, 18715, 18720, 18725, 18730, 18740, 18745, 18750, or 18755.

(3) A felony violation of Section 186.22.

(4) A felony violation of Section 11418, relating to weapons of mass destruction, Section 11418.5, relating to threats to use weapons of mass destruction, or
 Section 11419, relating to restricted biological agents.

(5) A violation of Section 236.1.

(6) A felony violation of subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 311.2 or subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 311.4.

(7) An attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the above-mentioned
 crimes.

(b) There is probable cause to believe that particular communications concerning the illegal activities will be obtained through that interception, including, but not limited to, communications that may be utilized for locating or rescuing a kidnap victim.

(c) There is probable cause to believe that the facilities from which, or the place where, the wire or electronic communications are to be intercepted are being used, or are about to be used, in connection with the commission of the offense, or are leased to, listed in the name of, or commonly used by the person whose communications are to be intercepted.

(d) Normal investigative procedures have been tried and have failed or reasonably appear either
 unlikely to succeed if tried or too dangerous.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, no magistrate shall enter an ex parte order authorizing interception of wire or electronic communications for the purpose of investigating or recovering evidence of a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 363, Sec. 1.   (AB 1892)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.    Note: This section was amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

629.53.

The Judicial Council may establish guidelines for judges to follow in granting an order authorizing the interception of any wire or electronic communications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 4.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.54.

Each order authorizing the interception of any wire or electronic communication shall specify all of the following:

(a) The identity, if known, of the person whose communications are to be intercepted, or if the identity is not known, then that information relating to the person’s identity known to the applicant.

(b) The nature and location of the communication facilities as to which, or the place where, authority to intercept is granted.
